Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1701.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 59-1701 to 59-1762 shall be known and may be cited as the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act.

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 41.